Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 2

Miscellaneous Provisions

48-1-201. Participation certificates in bonds or notes secured by mortgages on realty.

Persons issuing and selling participation certificates in bonds or notes secured by mortgages or deeds of trust on land wherever located shall hold legal title to such bonds or notes in trust for the use and benefit of bona fide purchasers of such certificates to the extent of the interests sold to such purchasers, and such certificates and the interests represented thereby shall not be subject to the claims of creditors of the trustee holding legal title.

Acts 1980, ch. 599, § 1; T.C.A., § 48-16-201; Acts 1985, ch. 110, § 1; T.C.A., § 48-2-201.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 48-2-201 was transferred to § 48-1-201 by the code commission in 2012.

Law Reviews.

The Federal Income Tax Considerations Involved in Forming and Operating a Bank Holding Company (Clayton D. Smith), 11 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 453 (1981).

Chapters 2-10

[Reserved]